Washington statutes.
RCW 43.220.170

Exemption from unemployment compensation coverage.

The services of corps members are exempt from unemployment compensation coverage under RCW 50.44.040(4) and the enrollees shall be so advised by the department.

[ 2011 c 20 s 8; 1983 1st ex.s. c 40 s 17.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2011 c 20: See note following RCW 43.220.020.